Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-198
Suits; filing; attorney's fee; expenses; allowance.

Suits shall be brought in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court as set out in the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, and the compensation court shall in each case designate and allow the amount of the attorney's fee and expenses to be paid from, but not in addition to, the award or judgment to the attorney representing the employee or his or her personal representatives, except as provided in section 48-125.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 127.